en: Vitamin B2 source, Source of vitamin B2, With vitamin B2
xx: Vitamin B2 source, Source of vitamin B2
bg: Източник на витамин B2
ca: Font de vitamina B2
de: Vitamin B2-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina B2
fi: B2-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine B2
hu: B2-vitaminforrás
it: Fonte di vitamina B2
nl: Bron van Vitamine B2
pl: Źródło witaminy B2
pt: Fonte de vitamina B2
ru: Источник витамина B2
sv: Källa till vitamin B2
th: แหล่งวิตามิน B2

en: Vitamin B3 source, Source of vitamin B3
xx: Vitamin B3 source, Source of vitamin B3
bg: Източник на витамин B3
ca: Font de vitamina B3
de: Vitamin B3-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina B3
fi: B3-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine B3
he: מקור לוויטמין B3
hr: izvor vitamina B3
hu: B3-vitaminforrás
it: Fonte di vitamina B3
nl: Bron van Vitamine B3
pl: Źródło witaminy B3
pt: Fonte de vitamina B3
ru: Источник витамина B3
sv: Källa till vitamin B3
th: แหล่งวิตามิน B3

en: Vitamin B6 source, Source of vitamin B6
xx: Vitamin B6 source
bg: Източник на витамин B6
de: Vitamin B6-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina B6
fi: B6-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine B6
he: מקור לוויטמין B6
hr: izvor vitamina B6
hu: B6-vitaminforrás
it: fonte di vitamina B6
nl: Bron van Vitamine B6
pl: Źródło witaminy B6
pt: Fonte de vitamina B6
ru: Источник витамина B6
sv: Källa till vitamin B6

en: Vitamin B9 source, Source of vitamin B9
xx: Vitamin B9 source
bg: Източник на витамин B9
de: Vitamin B9-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina B9
fi: B9-vitamiinin lähde, foolihapon lähde
fr: Source de vitamine B9
he: מקור לוויטמין B9
hr: izvor vitamina B9
it: Fonte di vitamina B9
nl: Bron van Vitamine B9
pl: Źródło witaminy B9
pt: Fonte de vitamina B9
ru: Источник витамина B9
sv: Källa till vitamin B9

en: Vitamin B12 source, Source of vitamin B12, With vitamin B12
xx: Vitamin B12 source
bg: Източник на витамин B12
ca: Font de vitamina B12
da: Kilde til vitamin B12
de: Vitamin B12-Quelle, Mit Vitamin B12
es: Fuente de vitamina B12
fi: B12-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine B12, Avec vitamine B12
hr: izvor vitamina B12
hu: B12-vitaminforrás
it: Fonte di vitamina B12
nb: Kilde til vitamin B12
nl: Bron van Vitamine B12
pl: Źródło witaminy B12
pt: Fonte de vitamina B12
ru: Источник витамина B12
sv: Källa till vitamin B12

en: source of biotin, Vitamin B7 source
xx: source of biotin
it: fonte di biotina, fonte di vitamina B7

en: source of pantothenic acid, Vitamin B5 source
xx: source of pantothenic acid

en: Vitamin C source, Source of vitamin C
bg: Източник на витамин C
ca: Font de vitamina C
de: Vitamin C-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina C
fi: C-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine C
he: מקור לוויטמין C
hr: izvor vitamina C
hu: C-vitaminforrás
it: Fonte di Vitamina C, fonte di acido ascorbico, fonte di principio antiscorbutico, fonte di ascorbato
nl: Bron van Vitamine C
pl: Źródło witaminy C
pt: Fonte de vitamina C
ru: Источник витамина C
sv: Källa till vitamin C
tr: C Vitamini kaynağı

en: Vitamin D source, Source of vitamin D, With vitamin D2
xx: Vitamin D source
bg: Източник на витамин D
ca: Font de Vitamina D
de: Vitamin D-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina D
fi: D-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine D
he: מקור לוויטמין D
hr: izvor vitamina D, visoka vsebnost vitamina D
hu: D-vitaminforrás
it: Fonte di vitamina D
nl: Bron van Vitamine D
pl: Źródło witaminy D
pt: Fonte de vitamina D
ru: Источник витамина D
sv: D-vitaminkälla
th: แหล่งของวิตามินดี

en: Vitamin E source, Source of vitamin E
xx: Vitamin E source
bg: Източник на витамин E
ca: Font de vitamina E
de: Vitamin E-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina E
fi: E-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine E
he: מקור לוויטמין E
hr: izvor vitamina E
hu: E-vitaminforrás
it: Fonte di vitamina E
nl: Bron van Vitamine E
pl: Źródło witaminy E
pt: Fonte de vitamina e
ru: Источник витамина E
sv: Källa till vitamin E

en: iron source, Source of iron
xx: iron source
bg: Източник на желязо
ca: Font de ferro
de: Eisenquelle
es: Fuente de hierro
fi: Raudan lähde
fr: Source de fer
hu: Vasforrás
it: Fonte di ferro
nl: Bron van IJzer
pl: Źródło żelaza
pt: Fonte de ferro
sv: Källa till järn
tr: Demir Kaynağı

en: Natural source of calcium, Natural calcium source
ca: Font natural de calci
de: Natürliche Kalziumquelle
es: Fuente de calcio natural
fi: Luonnollinen kalsiumin lähde
fr: Source naturelle de calcium
hr: Prirodni izvor kalcija
hu: Természetes Kalciumforrás
it: Fonte naturale di calcio
nl: Bron van natuurlijke Calcium
pl: Naturalne źródło wapnia
pt: Fonte natural de cálcio
ru: Источник натурального кальция

en: High in calcium
xx: High in calcium
ca: Ric en calci
de: Reich an Kalzium, Kalziumreiche
es: Alto contenido de calcio, Rico en calcio, Alto en calcio
fi: runsaasti kalsiumia, paljon kalsiumia
fr: Riche en calcium
he: עתיר בסידן
hu: Kalciumban gazdag
it: Ricco di calcio
nl: Rijk aan Calcium
pt: Rico em cálcio
ru: Обогащено кальцием
th: แคลเซียมสูง

en: Enriched with calcium
de: Mit Kalzium angereichert
es: Enriquecido con calcio
fi: lisätty kalsiumia
fr: Enrichi en calcium
he: מועשר בסידן
hu: Kalciummal dúsított
it: Arricchito con calcio
nl: verrijkt met calcium
pt: Enriquecido com cálcio
sv: Kalciumberikat, Berikad med kalcium

en: Enriched with vitamins
ca: Enriquit amb vitamines
da: Beriget med vitaminer
de: Mit Vitaminen angereichert
es: Enriquecido con vitaminas
fi: Vitaminoitu, Lisätty vitamiineja
fr: Enrichi en vitamines
he: מועשר בוויטמינים
hu: Vitaminokkal dúsított
it: Arricchito con vitamine
nl: verrijkt met vitaminen
pl: Wzbogacane witaminami
pt: Enriquecido com vitaminas
sv: Vitaminberikat, Vitaminberikad, Berikad med vitaminer

en: Enriched with calcium and vitamins
sv: Berikad med kalcium & vitaminer

en: Enriched with riboflavin
sv: Berikad med riboflavin

en: Enriched with vitamin D
sv: Berikad med vitamin D

en: Enriched with vitamin B12, B12 enriched
fr: Enrichi en vitamine B12
sv: Berikad med vitamin B12

en: Enriched with minerals
da: Beriget med mineraler
fi: Lisätty kivennäisaineita
fr: Enrichi en minéraux
hu: Ásványi anyagokkal dúsított
it: Arricchito con minerali
nl: verrijkt met mineralen
pt: Enriquecido com minerais